Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Chapter 9. Civil Commitment of Sexually Violent Predators.

§ 37.2-900.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Commissioner”
means the Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.

“Defendant”
means any person charged with a sexually violent offense who is deemed to be an unrestorably incompetent defendant pursuant to §

19.2-169.3

and is referred for commitment review pursuant to this chapter.

“Department”
means the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.

“Director”
means the Director of the Department of Corrections.

“Mental abnormality”
or

“personality disorder”

means a congenital or acquired condition that affects a person’s emotional or volitional capacity and renders the person so likely to commit sexually violent offenses that he constitutes a menace to the health and safety of others.

“Respondent”
means the person who is subject of a petition filed under this chapter.

“Sexually violent offense”
means a felony under (i) former § 18-54, former § 18.1-44, subdivision A 5 of §

18.2-31

, §

18.2-61

,

18.2-67.1

, or

18.2-67.2

; (ii) §

18.2-48

(ii),

18.2-48

(iii),

18.2-63

,

18.2-64.1

, or

18.2-67.3

; (iii) subdivision A 1 of §

18.2-31

where the abduction was committed with intent to defile the victim; (iv) §

18.2-32

when the killing was in the commission of, or attempt to commit rape, forcible sodomy, or inanimate or animate object sexual penetration; (v) the laws of the Commonwealth for a forcible sexual offense committed prior to July 1, 1981, where the criminal behavior is set forth in §

18.2-67.1

or

18.2-67.2

, or is set forth in §

18.2-67.3

; or (vi) conspiracy to commit or attempt to commit any of the above offenses.

“Sexually violent predator”
means any person who (i) has been convicted of a sexually violent offense, or has been charged with a sexually violent offense and is unrestorably incompetent to stand trial pursuant to §

19.2-169.3

; and (ii) because of a mental abnormality or personality disorder, finds it difficult to control his predatory behavior, which makes him likely to engage in sexually violent acts.

History.

1999, cc. 946, 985, § 37.1-70.1; 2001, c. 776; 2003, cc. 989, 1018; 2005, cc. 716, 914; 2006, cc. 863, 914; 2007, c. 876; 2009, cc. 740, 813, 840.

Cross references.

As to exclusion of records of the Commitment Review Committee concerning assessments of individuals subject to commitment as sexually violent predators from the provisions of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, see §§

2.2-3705.2

.

As to availability of court ordered psychiatric reports of criminal defendants, see §

19.2-301

.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, substituted “subdivision A 5 of §

18.2-31

” for “subdivision 5 of §

18.2-31

” and “subdivision A 1 of § 18.2-31” for “subdivision 1 of § 18.2-31” in the definition of “Sexually violent offense” to conform to changes by Acts 2019, cc. 717 and 835.

Acts 2005, c. 914, amended former § 37.1-70.1, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 5 and § 30-152, Acts 2005, c. 914 has been given effect in this section as set out above. The 2005 amendment by c. 914, in the definition of “Sexually violent offense,” substituted
“(ii) a conviction under §

18.2-67.3

where the complaining witness is less than 13 years of age; or (iii)” for “or subdivision A 1 of §

18.2-67.3

or (ii),” substituted “is set forth in” for “subdivision A 1 of” and added “where the complaining witness is less than 13 years of age” at the end of the paragraph.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 402 W, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “W.1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon the declaration by the Governor of a state of emergency pursuant to §

44-146.17

of the Code of Virginia in response to a communicable disease of public health threat as defined in § 44-146.16 of the Code of Virginia, the Director shall, during the duration of the declared emergency, have the authority to (i) discharge from incarceration or (ii) place into a lower level of supervision, including probation supervision, home electronic incarceration, or other forms of community corrections, any prisoner committed to the Department who has less than one year of his sentence remaining to be served prior to his scheduled release if the Director determines that (a) any such discharge or placement during the declared emergency will assist in maintaining the health, safety, and welfare of any prisoner discharged or placed or the prisoners remaining in state correctional facilities and (b) any such discharge or placement is compatible with the interests of society and public safety.

“2. The provisions of this section shall not apply to a prisoner convicted of a Class 1 felony or a sexually violent offense as defined in §

37.2-900

of the Code of Virginia.

“3. The Director shall develop procedures for implementing the provisions of this section which shall include provisions addressing reentry planning in accordance with §

53.1-32.2

of the Code of Virginia.
To the extent practicable, the Director shall comply with all provisions of the Virginia Code relating to providing notice of a prisoner’s discharge; however, any failure to comply with such notice provisions shall not affect the Director’s authority to discharge a prisoner pursuant to this section.

“4. The provisions of this section shall expire on July 1, 2021.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 863 and 914 are identical and, effective January 1, 2007, substituted “this chapter” for “§

37.2-905

” at the end of the paragraph defining “Defendant”; and in the paragraph defining “Sexually violent offense,” substituted “§

18.2-48

(ii),

18.2-48

(iii),

18.2-63

,

18.2-64.1

, or

18.2-67.3

” for “§

18.2-67.3

where the complaining witness is less than 13 years of age; or” at the end of clause (ii), deleted “where the complaining witness is less than 13 years of age” at the end of clause (iii), and added clause (iv).

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 876 inserted the definitions for “Commissioner,” “Department,” and “Respondent”; and rewrote the paragraph defining “sexually violent offense,” inserting items (iii) and (iv).

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 740 made a punctuation change in the last paragraph.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse” in the paragraphs defining “Commissioner” and “Department.”

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Criminal Law and Procedure,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 83 (2006).

For comment, “The $62 Million Question: Is Virginia’s New Center to House Sexually Violent Predators Money Well Spent?,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1301 (2007).

For article, “Taking Pedophilia Seriously,” see 72 Wash & Lee L. Rev. 75 (2015).

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 33 Writs and Injunctions. § 33.01 Writs. Friend.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-2028 Order for Treatment of Incompetent Defendant—Another Form.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

10A M.J. Insane and Other Incompetent Persons, § 3; 15 M.J. Rape and Other Sexual Offenses, § 27.

§ 37.2-900.1.
Office of Sexually Violent Predator Services.

There is hereby established within the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, the Office of Sexually Violent Predator Services for the purpose of administering the duties of the Department under this chapter.

History.

2006, cc. 681, 914; 2009, cc. 813, 840.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse.”

§ 37.2-901.
Civil proceeding; rights of respondents; discovery.

In hearings and trials held pursuant to this chapter, respondents shall have the following rights:

To receive adequate notice of the proceeding.

To be represented by counsel.

To remain silent or to testify.

To be present during the hearing or trial.

To present evidence and to cross-examine witnesses.

To view and copy all petitions and reports in the court file.In no event shall a respondent be permitted, as a part of any proceedings under this chapter, to raise challenges to the validity of his prior criminal or institutional convictions, charges, or sentences, or the computation of his term of confinement.In no event shall a respondent be permitted to raise defenses or objections based on defects in the institution of proceedings under this chapter unless such defenses or objections have been raised in a written motion to dismiss, stating the legal and factual grounds therefor, filed with the court at least 14 days before the hearing or trial.All proceedings conducted hereunder are civil proceedings. However, no discovery shall be allowed prior to the probable cause hearing. After the probable cause hearing, no discovery other than that provided in this section shall be allowed without prior leave of the court. Counsel for the respondent and any expert employed or appointed pursuant to this chapter may possess and copy the victim impact statement or presentence or postsentence report. In no event shall the respondent be permitted to retain or copy a victim impact statement or presentence or postsentence report.

History.

1999, cc. 946, 985, § 37.1-70.2; 2001, c. 776; 2003, cc. 989, 1018; 2005, cc. 716, 914; 2007, c. 876; 2009, c. 740; 2011, cc. 446, 448.

Cross references.

As to exclusion of records of the Commitment Review Committee concerning assessments of individuals subject to commitment as sexually violent predators from the provisions of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, see §§

2.2-3705.2

. As to availability of court ordered psychiatric reports of criminal defendants, see §

19.2-301

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 915, amended former § 37.1-70.2, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 5, the 2005 amendment by c. 914, has been given effect in the section as set out above by substituting “criminal or institutional convictions or sentences” for “criminal sentences or institutional convictions” in the second paragraph.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 876 in the first paragraph following subdivision 6, inserted “charges,” and added “or the computation of his term of confinement” to the end.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 740 substituted “respondents” for “prisoners or defendants” and “respondent” for “prisoner or defendant” throughout; and added third and fifth paragraphs.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 446 and 448 are identical, and deleted the former next-to-last paragraph, which read: “In the event the respondent refuses to cooperate with the mental health examination required under §

37.2-904

, the court may admit evidence of such refusal and may bar the respondent from introducing his own expert psychiatric or psychological evidence.”

§ 37.2-902.
Commitment Review Committee; membership.

The Director shall establish a Commitment Review Committee (CRC) to screen, evaluate, and make recommendations regarding prisoners and defendants for the purposes of this chapter. The CRC shall be under the supervision of the Department of Corrections. Members of the CRC and any licensed psychiatrists or licensed clinical psychologists providing examinations under subsection B of §

37.2-904

shall be immune from personal liability while acting within the scope of their duties except for gross negligence or intentional misconduct.

The CRC shall consist of seven members to be appointed as follows: (i) three full-time employees of the Department of Corrections, appointed by the Director; (ii) three full-time employees of the Department, appointed by the Commissioner, at least one of whom shall be a psychiatrist or psychologist licensed to practice in the Commonwealth who is skilled in the diagnosis and risk assessment of sex offenders and knowledgeable about the treatment of sex offenders; and (iii) one assistant or deputy attorney general, appointed by the Attorney General. Initial appointments by the Director and the Commissioner shall be for terms as follows: one member each for two years, one member each for three years, and one member each for four years. The initial appointment by the Attorney General shall be for a term of four years. Thereafter, all appointments to the CRC shall be for terms of four years, and vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired terms. Four members shall constitute a quorum.

The CRC shall meet at least monthly and at other times as it deems appropriate. The CRC shall elect a chairman from its membership to preside during meetings.

History.

1999, cc. 946, 985, § 37.1-70.3; 2001, c. 776; 2003, cc. 989, 1018; 2005, c. 716; 2007, c. 876; 2009, c. 740; 2011, c. 42.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 876, in subsection B, substituted “diagnosis, treatment and risk assessment of” for “diagnosis of mental abnormalities and personality disorders associated with violent” and “Four members” for “Five members.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 740 substituted “and defendants” for “in the custody of the Department of Corrections” in subsection A.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 42, in clause B (ii), deleted “treatment” following “diagnosis” and added “and knowledgeable about the treatment of sex offenders.”

§ 37.2-903.
Database of prisoners convicted of sexually violent offenses; maintained by Department of Corrections; notice of pending release to CRC.

The Director shall establish and maintain a database of each prisoner in his custody who is (i) incarcerated for a sexually violent offense or (ii) serving or will serve concurrent or consecutive time for another offense in addition to time for a sexually violent offense. The database shall include the following information regarding each prisoner: (a) the prisoner’s criminal record and (b) the prisoner’s sentences and scheduled date of release. A prisoner who is serving or will serve concurrent or consecutive time for other offenses in addition to his time for a sexually violent offense shall remain in the database until such time as he is released from the custody or supervision of the Department of Corrections or Virginia Parole Board for all of his charges. Prior to the initial assessment of a prisoner under subsection B, the Director shall order a national criminal history records check to be conducted on the prisoner.

Each month, the Director shall review the database and, using an evidence-based assessment protocol approved by the Director and the Commissioner, shall identify all such prisoners who are scheduled for release from prison within 24 months from the date of such review or have been referred to the Director by the Virginia Parole Board under rules adopted by the Board who appear to meet the definition of a sexually violent predator.

The Commissioner shall forward to the Director the records of all defendants who have been charged with a sexually violent offense and found unrestorably incompetent to stand trial, and ordered to be screened pursuant to §

19.2-169.3

. The Director, applying the procedure identified in subsection B, shall identify those defendants who shall be referred to the CRC for assessment.

Upon the identification of such prisoners and defendants screened pursuant to subsections B and C, the Director shall forward their names, their scheduled dates of release, court orders finding the defendants unrestorably incompetent, and copies of their files to the CRC for assessment.

The Commissioner shall report annually by December 1 to the Chairmen of the House Committees on Appropriations and Courts of Justice, the Senate Committees on the Judiciary and on Finance and Appropriations, and the Crime Commission on (i) the assessment protocol approved by the Director and the Commissioner to identify prisoners and defendants who appear to meet the definition of a sexually violent predator pursuant to subsections B and C, including the specific screening instrument adopted and the criteria used to determine whether a prisoner or defendant meets the definition of a sexually violent predator and (ii) the number of prisoners screened pursuant to subsection B and the number of prisoners identified as meeting the definition of a sexually violent predator and referred to the CRC for assessment pursuant to subsection D. Such report shall also include a comparison of the number of defendants identified as appearing to meet the definition of a sexually violent predator and referred to the CRC pursuant to subsection C in the previous year and the five years immediately prior thereto.

History.

1999, cc. 946, 985, § 37.1-70.4; 2001, c. 776; 2003, cc. 989, 1018; 2005, cc. 716, 914; 2006, cc. 863, 914; 2007, c. 876; 2009, c. 740; 2010, c. 389; 2012, cc. 668, 800; 2018, c. 841.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 914, amended former § 37.1-70.4.
Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 5, Acts 2005, c. 914 has been given effect in this section as set out above.
The 2005 amendment by c. 914, in subsection B, inserted the clause (i) designator and clause (ii) in the first sentence, deleted “and (iii) the appropriate locality for a commitment petition” in the second sentence, and added the third sentence; and in subsection C, deleted “of prisoners incarcerated for sexually violent offenses” following “the database” in the first sentence.

Acts 2012, cc. 668 and 800, cl. 2 provides: “That the Director, in coordination with the Department, shall develop protocols to assess whether the individual meets the definition of a sexually violent predator and shall report to the General Assembly on protocol objectives, design, methodology, statistical considerations, embedded assumptions, risk assessments, and organization of the full assessment process. All measures shall be consistent with evidenced-based best practices. The primary tool of the protocols shall be a risk assessment instrument and corresponding reference score designated by the Commissioner. The Director shall submit the report to the Governor and the General Assembly by January 1, 2013.”

Acts 2012, cc. 668 and 800, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2013.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “the Senate Committees on the Judiciary and on Finance and Appropriations” for “the Senate Committees on Courts of Justice and Finance” in subsection E. March 10, 2021.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 863 and 914 are nearly identical, and in subsection B, in the first sentence, substituted “each prisoner in his custody who is” for “prisoners in his custody who are,” substituted “a sexually violent offense” for “sexually violent offenses” in clause (i), substituted “another offense” for “other offenses” in clause (ii), and added the last sentence; in subsection C, substituted “five or more on the Static-99” for “four or more on the Rapid Risk Assessment for Sexual Offender Recidivism” and added the language beginning “or a score of four on the Static-99” at the end; added subsection D and redesignated former subsection D as E.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 876 substituted “diagnosis, treatment and risk assessment of sex” for “diagnosis and treatment of mental abnormalities and disorders associated with criminal sexual” in subsection A; and, in subsection C, twice substituted “similar” for “like,” deleted “(a) clause (iii) of subsection A of §

18.2-61

; (b) subdivision A 1 of §

18.2-67.1

; (c) subdivision A 1 of §

18.2-67.2

; or (d) subdivision A 1 of” preceding “§

18.2-67.3

,” and added “and any of the following where the victim was under the age of 13: §

18.2-61

,

18.2-67.1

, or

18.2-67.2

” to the end.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 740 deleted former subsection A, which read: “The Director shall establish and maintain a treatment program for prisoners convicted pursuant to Article 7 (§

18.2-61

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of Title 18.2 and committed to the custody of the Department of Corrections. This program shall include a clinical assessment of all such prisoners upon receipt into the custody of the Department of Corrections and the development of appropriate treatment plans, if indicated. This program shall be operated under the direction of a licensed psychiatrist or licensed clinical psychologist who is experienced in the diagnosis, treatment and risk assessment of sex offenders”; and redesignated former subsections B through E as present subsections A through D, respectively.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 389 substituted “screened by a licensed psychiatrist, licensed clinical psychologist, or a licensed mental health professional certified by the Board of Psychology as a sex offender treatment provider pursuant to §

54.1-3600

” for “evaluated by a licensed psychiatrist or licensed clinical psychologist” in subsection C.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by cc. 668 and 800, effective January 1, 2013, are almost identical, and rewrote subsection B, which read: “Each month, the Director shall review the database and identify all such prisoners who are scheduled for release from prison within 10 months from the date of such review who receive a score of five or more on the Static-99 or a similar score on a comparable, scientifically validated instrument designated by the Commissioner, or a score of four on the Static-99 or a similar score on a comparable, scientifically validated instrument if the sexually violent offense mandating the prisoner’s evaluation under this section was a violation of §

18.2-67.3

where the victim was under the age of 13 and suffered physical bodily injury and any of the following where the victim was under the age of 13: §

18.2-61

,

18.2-67.1

, or

18.2-67.2

.”; inserted subsection D and redesignated former subsection D as subsection E; and inserted “and defendants screened pursuant to subsections B, C, and D” and “court orders finding the defendants unrestorably incompetent” in subsection E.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 841 rewrote subsection B, deleted subsection C and added subsection E; and made stylistic changes.

§ 37.2-904.
CRC assessment of prisoners or defendants eligible for commitment as sexually violent predators; mental health examination; recommendation.

Within 180 days of receiving from the Director the name of a prisoner or defendant who has been assessed by the Director pursuant to §

37.2-903

, the CRC shall (i) complete its assessment of the prisoner or defendant for possible commitment pursuant to subsection B and (ii) forward its written recommendation regarding the prisoner or defendant to the Attorney General pursuant to subsection C.

CRC assessments of eligible prisoners or defendants shall include a mental health examination, including a personal interview, of the prisoner or defendant by a licensed psychiatrist or a licensed clinical psychologist who is designated by the Commissioner, skilled in the diagnosis and risk assessment of sex offenders, knowledgeable about the treatment of sex offenders, and not a member of the CRC. If the prisoner’s or defendant’s name was forwarded to the CRC based upon an evaluation by a licensed psychiatrist or licensed clinical psychologist, a different licensed psychiatrist or licensed clinical psychologist shall perform the examination for the CRC. The licensed psychiatrist or licensed clinical psychologist shall determine whether the prisoner or defendant is a sexually violent predator, as defined in §

37.2-900

, and forward the results of this evaluation and any supporting documents to the CRC for its review.The CRC assessment may be based on:An actuarial evaluation, clinical evaluation, or any other information or evaluation determined by the CRC to be relevant, including but not limited to a review of (i) the prisoner’s or defendant’s institutional history and treatment record, if any; (ii) his criminal background; and (iii) any other factor that is relevant to the determination of whether he is a sexually violent predator.

Following the examination and review conducted pursuant to subsection B, the CRC shall recommend that the prisoner or defendant (i) be committed as a sexually violent predator pursuant to this chapter; (ii) not be committed, but be placed in a conditional release program as a less restrictive alternative; or (iii) not be committed because he does not meet the definition of a sexually violent predator. To assist the Attorney General in his review, the Department of Corrections, the CRC, and the psychiatrist or psychologist who conducts the mental health examination pursuant to this section shall provide the Attorney General with all evaluation reports, prisoner records, criminal records, medical files, and any other documentation relevant to determining whether a prisoner or defendant is a sexually violent predator.

Pursuant to clause (ii) of subsection C, the CRC may recommend that a prisoner or defendant enter a conditional release program if it finds that (i) he does not need inpatient treatment, but needs outpatient treatment and monitoring to prevent his condition from deteriorating to a degree that he would need inpatient treatment; (ii) appropriate outpatient supervision and treatment are reasonably available; (iii) there is significant reason to believe that, if conditionally released, he would comply with the conditions specified; and (iv) conditional release will not present an undue risk to public safety.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any mental health professional employed or appointed pursuant to subsection B or §

37.2-907

shall be permitted to copy and possess any presentence or postsentence reports and victim impact statements. The mental health professional shall not disseminate the contents of the reports or the actual reports to any person or entity and shall only utilize the reports for use in examinations, creating reports, and testifying in any proceedings pursuant to this article.

If the CRC deems it necessary to have the services of additional experts in order to complete its review of the prisoner or defendant, the Commissioner shall appoint such qualified experts as are needed.

History.

1999, cc. 946, 985, § 37.1-70.5; 2001, c. 776; 2003, cc. 989, 1018; 2004, c. 764; 2005, cc. 716, 914; 2006, cc. 863, 914; 2007, c. 876; 2009, c. 740; 2011, c. 42; 2012, cc. 668, 800.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 914, amended former § 37.1-70.5, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to § 30-152, and Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 5, the 2005 amendment by c. 914 is given effect in this section as set out above by substituting “in the database” for “incarcerated for a sexually violent offense” in subsection A; substituting “eligible prisoners” for “prisoners incarcerated for sexually violent offenses” in subsection B; inserting “departments” in subsection E; and adding subsections F and G.

Acts 2012, cc. 668 and 800, cl. 2 provides: “That the Director, in coordination with the Department, shall develop protocols to assess whether the individual meets the definition of a sexually violent predator and shall report to the General Assembly on protocol objectives, design, methodology, statistical considerations, embedded assumptions, risk assessments, and organization of the full assessment process. All measures shall be consistent with evidenced-based best practices. The primary tool of the protocols shall be a risk assessment instrument and corresponding reference score designated by the Commissioner. The Director shall submit the report to the Governor and the General Assembly by January 1, 2013.”

Acts 2012, cc. 668 and 800, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2013.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 863 and 914 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted “or from a court referring an incompetent defendant pursuant to §

19.2-169.3

” and “or defendant”; inserted “or incompetent defendant” or a variation in subsections B, C and D; in subsection B, in the first sentence, deleted “violent” preceding “sex offenders” and inserted the second sentence, and in the fourth sentence, inserted the subdivision 1 and 2 designators, substituted “Static-99” for “ Rapid Risk Assessment for Sexual Offender Recidivism,” substituted “his” for “the prisoner’s” in clause (ii), and substituted “he” for “prisoner” in clause (iii); in subsection C, deleted “of a prisoner” following “review” in the first sentence; in subsection D, substituted “he” for “the prisoner” in clause (i) and “that, if conditionally released, he” for “that the prisoner, if conditionally released” in clause (iii); and added subsection H.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 876 deleted “incompetent” preceding “defendant” throughout and made similar and related changes; substituted “120 days” for “90 days” in subsection A; substituted “and risk assessment of” for “of mental abnormalities and disorders associated with” in the first paragraph of B; substituted “may be based on” for “shall also include” in the first paragraph following subsection B; deleted subdivision B 1 and the first paragraph following former subdivision B 2, pertaining to consideration of a prisoner’s score on the Static-99 and authority for the CRC to possess presentence reports, postsentence reports, and victim impact statements, respectively, and made related changes; added the language beginning “An actuarial evaluation” and ending “but not limited to” to the beginning of the present second paragraph following subsection B; substituted “may” for “shall” in subsection D; deleted subsections E and G, pertaining to 20-day reporting period to provide requested records to the CRC and permission for certain mental health professionals to testify at probable cause hearings, respectively, and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and rewrote present subsection E.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 740 inserted “or defendant” in subsections A and F.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 42, in the first sentence in subsection B, deleted “treatment” following “diagnosis” and inserted “knowledgeable about the treatment of sex offenders.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 668 and 800, effective January 1, 2013, are identical, and substituted “Within 180 days of receiving from the Director the name of a prisoner or defendant who has been assessed by the Director pursuant to §

37.2-903

” for “Within 120 days of receiving notice from the Director pursuant to §

37.2-903

regarding a prisoner who is in the database, or from a court referring a defendant pursuant to §

19.2-169.3

” in subsection A.

§ 37.2-905.
Review of prisoners convicted of a sexually violent offense; review of unrestorably incompetent defendants charged with sexually violent offenses; petition for commitment; notice to Department of Corrections or referring court regarding disposition of review.

Upon receipt of a recommendation by the CRC regarding an eligible prisoner or an unrestorably incompetent defendant for review pursuant to §

19.2-169.3

, the Attorney General shall have 90 days to conduct a review of the prisoner or defendant and (i) file a petition for the civil commitment of the prisoner or defendant as a sexually violent predator and stating sufficient facts to support such allegation or (ii) notify the Director and Commissioner, in the case of a prisoner, or the referring court and the Commissioner, in the case of an unrestorably incompetent defendant, that he will not file a petition for commitment. Petitions for commitment shall be filed in the circuit court for the judicial circuit or district in which the prisoner was last convicted of a sexually violent offense or in the circuit court for the judicial circuit or district in which the defendant was deemed unrestorably incompetent and referred for commitment review pursuant to §

19.2-169.3

.

If the Attorney General decides not to file a petition for the civil commitment of a prisoner or defendant, or if a petition is filed but is dismissed for any reason, the Attorney General and the Director may share any relevant information with the probation and parole officer who is to supervise the prisoner and with the Department to the extent allowed by state and federal law.

History.

1999, cc. 946, 985, § 37.1-70.6; 2001, c. 776; 2003, cc. 989, 1018; 2004, c. 764; 2005, cc. 716, 914; 2006, cc. 863, 914; 2007, c. 876; 2009, c. 740.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 914, amended former § 37.1-70.6, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to § 30-152, and Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 5, the 2005 amendment by c. 914 is given effect in this section as set out above. The 2005 amendment by c. 914 substituted “an eligible prisoner” for “a prisoner incarcerated for a sexually violent offense” near the beginning of the first sentence of subsection A; added clause (vii) of subsection C; added subsection E; and made related changes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 863 and 914 are identical, and deleted “upon receipt of a court order referring” preceding “an unreasonably incompetent” in subsection A; in subsection C, inserted “the CRC recommendation and its reasoning, (ii),” redesignated former clauses (ii) and (iii) as clauses (iii) and (iv), inserted clause (v), redesignated former clauses (iv) through (vi) as clauses (vi) through (viii), and deleted former clause (vii), which read: “the mental health evaluation performed pursuant to subsection E”; and rewrote subsection E, which formerly read: “Whenever a court refers an incompetent defendant to the Attorney General for review, the court shall also appoint a licensed psychiatrist or licensed clinical psychologist from the list maintained by the Commissioner pursuant to subsection B of §

37.2-904

to conduct a mental health evaluation, including a personal interview, of the incompetent defendant. The licensed psychiatrist or licensed clinical psychologist shall determine whether the incompetent defendant is a sexually violent predator as defined in §

37.2-900

and shall forward the results of this evaluation and any supporting documents to the Attorney General within 45 days of his appointment.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 876 deleted subsections B through D, pertaining to required determinations for filing a petition to civilly commit a prisoner and authority of the Attorney General.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 740, in subsection A, inserted “for the judicial circuit or district” and “the circuit court for the judicial circuit or district in”; in subsection B, deleted “and the prisoner or defendant has outstanding probation or parole time to serve” following “dismissed for any reason” and inserted “who is to supervise the prisoner and with the Department.”

§ 37.2-905.1.
Substantial compliance.

The provisions of §§

37.2-903

,

37.2-904

, and

37.2-905

are procedural and not substantive or jurisdictional. Absent a showing of failure to follow these provisions as a result of gross negligence or willful misconduct, it shall be presumed that there has been substantial compliance with these provisions.

History.

2007, c. 876; 2009, c. 740.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 740 inserted “37.2-905” and made a related change.

§ 37.2-905.2.
Access to records.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law and for the purpose of performing their duties and obligations under this chapter, the Department of Corrections, the Commitment Review Committee, the Department, and the Office of the Attorney General are authorized to possess, copy, and use all records, including records under seal, from all state and local courts, clerks, departments, agencies, boards, and commissions, including but not limited to offices of attorneys for the Commonwealth, the Virginia State Police, local police and sheriffs departments, local schools, institutions of higher education, the Department of Juvenile Justice, court services units, community services boards, the Department, state and local departments of social services, and probation and parole districts. Upon request, the records, documents, notes, recordings, or other information of any kind shall be provided to the Department of Corrections, the Commitment Review Committee, the Department, or the Office of the Attorney General within 20 days of receiving such request.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Department of Corrections, the Commitment Review Committee, the Department, and the Office of the Attorney General may possess, copy, and use presentence reports, postsentence reports, and victim impact statements, including records under seal, for all lawful purposes under this chapter.

History.

2007, c. 876; 2009, c. 740.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the following changes were made to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588: in subsection A, substituted “institutions of higher education” for “colleges and universities”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 740 inserted “including records under seal” both times it appears; and in subsection A, substituted “possess, copy, and use” for “review and receive copies of.”